Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3811
Severability.

If any section in sections 48-3801 to 48-3811 or any part of any section is declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.

Initiative Law 2024, No. 436, § 11.